Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Corrections, in cooperation with the Oregon Criminal
Justice Commission, shall establish a pilot program to provide legal services that  assist
adults in custody  who are serving sentences at the Coffee Creek Correctional Facility to re-
enter and reintegrate into local communities, to reduce  vulnerability to domestic violence
and to obtain employment, housing services and other benefits for the adults in custody.
(2) The commission shall carry out the purposes of  subsection (1) of this section by
granting to the Oregon Justice Resource Center  an amount sufficient for the center to em-
ploy three attorneys and to provide necessary support for the attorneys’ work.
(3) The commission and the Oregon Justice Resource Center shall  evaluate the oper-
ations and success of the pilot program and report the results of the evaluation to an interim
committee of the Legislative Assembly related to corrections not later than  September 15,
2023.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2022 Act is repealed on December 31, 2024.
SECTION 3. This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4050 (HB 4050-A) Page 1
Passed by House February 24, 2022
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 2, 2022
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4050 (HB 4050-A) Page 2